Utah statutes.
53-15-201.   Designation -- Administration.

(1)  The National McGruff House Network Program is hereby designated as the officially recognized statewide "safe house" program for Utah.

(2)  The program shall be administered through the Department of Public Safety by the Utah Council for Crime Prevention.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

